Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-4409
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that:

(1) There is a high degree of competition among states and municipalities in our nation in their efforts to provide incentives for businesses to expand or to locate in their respective jurisdictions; and

(2) Municipalities in Nebraska are unable to effectively assist the development within good life districts formed pursuant to the Good Life Transformational Projects Act because of their inability under Nebraska law to raise sufficient capital to replace the state sales tax which is reduced when a good life district is established. Without an efficient replacement of such sales tax with local sources of revenue, development within good life districts will fall short of reaching the full potential intended by the Legislature when it enacted the Good Life Transformational Projects Act, resulting in lower sales tax revenues for the state. To prevent such diminished revenues for the state and to promote local economic development where good life districts exist, local sources of revenue must be established which are tailored to meet the needs of the local community and benefit the state, if the voters in the municipality determine that it is in the best interest of their community to do so.

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 2.

Good Life Transformational Projects Act, see section 77-4401.